Wyoming, session 2025, HB0278.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-10-108, 22-10-110, 22-11-103(c)
and 22-11-104(b)(iii) are amended to read:

22-10-108. Procedure for preparing machines for
election; inspection and certification.

HB0278

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0535
(a) Before preparing a voting machine for an
election, the county clerk shall, not later than five (5)
days before a test of a voting machine or not later than
twenty-four (24) hours before any re-test of a voting
machine, post a public notice in the office of the county
clerk and on the website of the county clerk and notify in
writing the county chairman of each political party having
a candidate on the ballot and all independent candidates,
stating the time and place where the voting machine will be
prepared for the election. The political party
representatives and representatives of independent
candidates Members of the public may be present at the
preparation of the voting machine for the election, to see
that the machine is tested for accuracy and is properly
prepared and that all registering counters are set at zero
(00000). The county clerk, in the presence of these
representatives attendees, shall prepare the voting machine
for the election and set all registering counters at zero
(00000). He shall then test each registering counter for
accuracy by casting votes on it until the registering
counter is correctly registering each vote cast on it. The
county clerk shall then reset each registering counter to
zero (00000) and shall immediately lock and seal the voting
HB0278

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0535
machine with a numbered metal seal and make a record of the
number of the seal on the certificate for the machine. The
seal shall be so placed as to prevent operation of the
machine or its registering counters without breaking the
seal. The county clerk shall then immediately make a record
on the certificate for the machine of the reading shown on
the protective counter.

(b) Inspection of voting machines may shall begin not
less than two (2) weeks before an election and continue
until all machines to be used are publicly tested and
sealed. Immediately following testing of a machine, the
county clerk shall make a certificate in writing stating
the serial number of each machine, whether the machine has
all the registering counters set at zero (00000), and
whether the machine has been tested by voting on each
registering counter to prove that each registering counter
is in perfect and accurate condition, the number registered
on the protective counter, and the number on the seal with
which the machine is sealed against operation. This
certificate shall be filed with the secretary of state and
a copy shall be kept on file in the office of the county
clerk.
HB0278

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0535

(c) No voting machine shall be used in any election
unless the machine is tested and prepared in accordance
with this section.

22-10-110. Objections.

A voting machine prepared for an election and certified by
the county clerk shall be conclusively presumed to be
properly prepared unless within two (2) days may be
challenged after the machine is sealed and certified before
the election if a complaint is filed in the district court
of the county stating the number of the machine and the
grounds for objecting to its use.

22-11-103. Capabilities required.

(c) The secretary of state may from time to time as
necessary promulgate rules and regulations consistent with
subsection (a) of this section and with all other
requirements of this Election Code to govern the
characteristics of electronic voting systems that may be
used in Wyoming. The rules shall ensure the fairness and
HB0278

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0535
accuracy of elections. The rules may govern both the
characteristics of the systems and the procedures to be
followed in testing and using the systems. The rules shall
allow the county clerks to follow appropriate
recommendations of the vendors of the systems for
maintenance and management of the systems to the extent
these recommendations are not inconsistent with this
Election Code and with the rules. The rules shall be
adopted following consultation with the county clerks.

22-11-104. Conduct of elections in which systems
utilized.

(b) The county clerk of each county using an
electronic voting system shall:

(iii) Before testing an electronic voting system
for an election, not later than five (5) days before a test
of an electronic voting system or not later than
twenty-four (24) hours before any re-test of an electronic
voting system, post a public notice in the office of the
county clerk and the website of the county clerk and notify
the state chairman and the county chairman of each
HB0278

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0535
political party having a candidate on the ballot, stating
the time and place of the test. The political party
representatives and representatives of independent
candidates Members of the public may be present for the
test, which shall be held at least two (2) weeks before the
election. The test shall ascertain that the all automatic
tabulating equipment to be used in the election will
accurately count the votes cast on all ballot styles that
may be used in the election for all offices and all
measures. The test shall be conducted by processing a
preaudited group of paper ballots or ballot cards all
ballot styles on which are recorded a predetermined number
of valid votes for each candidate and on each measure and
shall include for each office one (1) or more ballots which
have votes in excess of the number allowed by law in order
to test the ability of the automatic tabulating equipment
to reject such votes. If the primary method of voting in
the county is by an electronic ballot marking device, the
test shall be conducted using ballots or ballot cards that
are marked by an electronic ballot marking device. During
the test a different number of valid votes shall be
assigned to each candidate, including write-in candidates,
for an office, and for and against each measure, including
HB0278

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0535
at least one (1) undervote and one (1) overvote in each
race or measure in each precinct and in each county. If any
error is detected, or if the test is not completed in
compliance with law, the cause of it shall be ascertained
and corrected and an errorless count shall be secured and
certified to by the county clerk. On completion of the
count, the results shall be retained by the county clerk,
posted to the county clerk's website and a copy of the
results shall be provided to any person upon request. The
programs, test materials and ballots shall be sealed and
retained as provided for paper ballots, provided that if a
re-test is required the seals may be broken so that an
errorless count can be secured and certified as provided in
this paragraph;

Section 2. W.S. 22-10-110 is repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0278